District of Columbia statutes.
42-2706.04

Disposition of assets on dissolution.

If the Agency is dissolved by repeal of this chapter, or ceases to exist for any other reason, all of its assets (including, but not limited to, cash, accounts receivable, reserve funds, real or personal property, and contract and other rights) shall automatically be assigned to and become the property of the District.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 604
as added Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-28, § 2(w), 28 DCR 2848

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2164.
1973 Ed., § 45-1932.